Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Article 3. Judicial Notice of Foreign Law

Cross references. —

See also Rule 44.1, W.R.C.P.

Law reviews. —

As to effect of Rule 201, W.R.E. on this article, see XIII Land & Water L. Rev. 581 (1978).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

29 Am. Jur. 2d Evidence § 109.

31A C.J.S. Evidence §§ 18 to 22, 46.

What constitutes “adjudicative facts” within meaning of Rule 201 of Federal Rules of Evidence concerning judicial notice of adjudicative facts, 150 ALR Fed 543.

§ 1-12-301.
Proof of laws of foreign jurisdictions.

Printed copies of written
law enacted by any other state, territory or foreign government purporting
or proved to have been published by the authority thereof, or proved
to be commonly admitted as evidence of the existing law in the courts
or tribunals of the state, territory or government shall be admitted
by the courts and officers of this state on all occasions as prima
facie evidence of the law. The unwritten or common law of any other
state, territory or foreign government may be proved by parol evidence
and the books of reports of cases adjudicated in their courts may
also be admitted as prima facie evidence of the law.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 252; R.S. 1887, § 2592; R.S. 1899, § 3686; C.S. 1910, § 4541; C.S. 1920, § 5810; R.S. 1931, § 89-1707; C.S. 1945, § 3-3108; W.S. 1957, § 1-179; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-12-601

.

Failure to comply with requirements to take judicial notice of foreign law. —

In a custody dispute, a father's claim that the father should have been granted custody or visitation in France, based on a claim that the children were or could become French citizens, failed because (1) the claim was properly considered in the context of the statutory best interest factors, (2) the father did not comply with Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

1-12-301

through

1-12-306

so as to allow the court to take judicial notice of French law, and (3) the father filed no transcript of the trial court's proceedings. Harignordoquy v. Barlow, 2013 WY 149, 313 P.3d 1265,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 156

(Wyo. 2013), cert. denied, 574 U.S. 817, 135 S. Ct. 66, 190 L. Ed. 2d 33, 2014 U.S. LEXIS 5136 (U.S. 2014).

Applied

in

Roberts v. Locke, 2013 WY 73, 304 P.3d 116,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 78

(Jun 17, 2013); Roberts v. Locke, 2013 WY 73, 304 P.3d 116,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 78

(Jun 17, 2013).

§ 1-12-302.
Judicial notice required.

Every court of this state
shall take judicial notice of the common law and statutes of every
state, territory and other jurisdiction of the United States.

History.

Laws 1941, ch. 78, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 3-3109; W.S. 1957, § 1-180; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-12-602.

Notice that law operative in foreign jurisdiction. —

Under this act courts of Wyoming take judicial notice of common law and statutes of other states, and supreme court judicially notices that Colorado statutes from which it made verbatim excerpts are operative in Colorado. Trepanier v. Standard Mining & Milling Co., 58 Wyo. 29, 123 P.2d 378,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(1942).

But not occurrences in federal bureaus. —

This section does not permit courts to take judicial notice of the occurrences in federal bureaus. Torgeson v. Connelly, 348 P.2d 63,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1959).

Scope more limited than in California. —

A comparison of this section with provisions in California disclosed that the scope of judicial notice as to public records is much more limited in Wyoming than in California. Dame v. Mileski, 80 Wyo. 156, 340 P.2d 205,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1959).

Applied

in

Ohio Oil Co. v. Wyoming Agency, 63 Wyo. 187, 179 P.2d 773,

1947 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(1947).

Quoted

in

Bowers v. Getter Trucking Co., 514 P.2d 837,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 183

(Wyo. 1973); Duke v. Housen, 589 P.2d 334,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 343

(Wyo. 1979).

§ 1-12-303.
Manner of obtaining information.

The court may inform
itself of foreign laws in such manner as it deems proper, and the
court may call upon counsel to aid in obtaining such information.

History.

Laws 1941, ch. 78, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 3-3110; W.S. 1957, § 1-181; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-12-603.

Applied

in

Logan v. Pacific Intermountain Express Co., 400 P.2d 488,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 130

(Wyo. 1965).

Quoted

in

Duke v. Housen, 589 P.2d 334,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 343

(Wyo. 1979).

§ 1-12-304.
Determination of foreign law; reviewability.

The determination of
foreign laws shall be made by the court and not by the jury, and is
reviewable.

History.

Laws 1941, ch. 78, § 3; C.S. 1945, § 3-3111; W.S. 1957, § 1-182; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-12-604.

Applied

in

Logan v. Pacific Intermountain Express Co., 400 P.2d 488,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 130

(Wyo. 1965).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Raising and determining issue of foreign law under Rule 44.1 of Federal Rules of Civil Procedure, 62 ALR Fed 521.

§ 1-12-305.
Reasonable notice to be given adverse party.

Any party may present
to the trial court any admissible evidence of foreign laws, but to
enable a party to offer evidence of the law in another jurisdiction
or to ask that judicial notice be taken thereof, reasonable notice
shall be given to the adverse parties in the pleadings or otherwise.

History.

Laws 1941, ch. 78, § 4; C.S. 1945, § 3-3112; W.S. 1957, § 1-183; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-12-605.

§ 1-12-306.
Laws of jurisdictions outside United States.

The law of a jurisdiction
other than a state, territory or jurisdiction of the United States,
is an issue for the court but is not subject to the foregoing provisions
concerning judicial notice.

History.

Laws 1941, ch. 78, § 5; C.S. 1945, § 3-3113; W.S. 1957, § 1-184; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-12-606.

Repealing clauses. —

Section 8, ch. 78, Laws 1941, repealed all laws and parts of laws in conflict with that act.

Law of Nicaragua not judicially noticed. —

This article seems to make it clear Wyoming courts do not take judicial notice of the law of Nicaragua. In re Estate of Sowerwine, 413 P.2d 48,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 141

(Wyo. 1966).